Florida, session 2026, HB459.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
51
52 Section 1. Section 627.7015, Florida Statutes, is amended
53 to read:
54 627.7015 Mandatory Alternative procedure for resolution of
55 disputed property insurance claims.—
56 (1) This section sets forth a nonadversarial alternative
57 dispute resolution procedure for an a mediated claim resolution
58 conference prompted by the need for effective, fair, and timely
59 resolution handling of disputed property insurance claims. There
60 is a particular need for a mandatory an informal, nonthreatening
61 forum, available at the election of either party, for helping
62 parties who elect this procedure to resolve their claims
63 disputes regarding because most homeowner and commercial
64 residential insurance policies obligate policyholders to
65 participate in a potentially expensive and time-consuming
66 adversarial appraisal process before litigation. The procedure
67 set forth in this section is designed to bring the parties
68 together to ensure the efficient delivery of the coverage
69 offered under the policy, helping to restore an owner's property
70 and livelihood to normalcy after a disaster or loss while
71 maintaining reasonable costs to the insurer for a mediated
72 claims settlement conference without any of the trappings or
73 drawbacks of an adversarial process. Before participating in
74 resorting to these procedures, policyholders and insurers are
75 encouraged to resolve claims as quickly and fairly as possible.
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
76 The department, the office, and the Division of Administrative
77 Hearings shall administer this section in a manner that
78 facilitates the self-execution of the system and the process of
79 ensuring a prompt and cost-effective delivery of payments to
80 insureds This section is available with respect to claims under
81 personal lines and commercial residential policies before
82 commencing the appraisal process , or before commencing
83 litigation. Mediation may be requested only by the policyholder,
84 as a first-party claimant, a third-party, as an assignee of the
85 policy benefits, or the insurer. However, an insurer is not
86 required to participate in any mediation requested by a third-
87 party assignee of the policy benefits. If requested by the
88 policyholder, Participation by legal counsel is permitted but is
89 not required. Expert testimony may be used in the procedure,
90 regardless of whether legal counsel is participating. Mediation
91 under this section is also available to litigants referred to
92 the department by a county court or circuit court. This section
93 does not apply to commercial coverages, to private passenger
94 motor vehicle insurance coverages, or to disputes relating to
95 liability coverages in policies of property insurance.
96 (2) At the time of issuance and renewal of a policy or at
97 the time a first-party claim within the scope of this section is
98 filed by the policyholder, the insurer shall notify the
99 policyholder of the mandatory procedure its right to participate
100 in the mediation program under this section. A claim becomes
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
101 eligible for mediation after the insurer complies with s.
102 627.70131(7) or elects to reinspect pursuant to s.
103 627.70152(4)(a)3. If the insurer has not complied with s.
104 627.70131(7) or elected to reinspect pursuant to s.
105 627.70152(4)(a)3. within 90 days after notice of the loss, the
106 insurer may not require mediation under this section. This
107 subsection does not impair the right of an insurance company to
108 request mediation after a determination of coverage pursuant to
109 this section or require appraisal or another method of
110 alternative dispute resolution pursuant to s. 627.70152(4)(b).
111 The department shall prepare a consumer information pamphlet for
112 distribution to be provided to policyholders at the time of
113 issuance and renewal of the policy and upon the Governor's
114 declaration of a state of emergency within the policyholder's
115 county persons participating in mediation.
116 (3) A policyholder or an insurer may, for any claim that
117 is ripe, due, and owing, file a petition with the Division of
118 Administrative Hearings to resolve claims which meets the
119 requirements of this section. A party represented by an attorney
120 shall file by electronic means. A party not represented by an
121 attorney may file by certified mail or by electronic means. The
122 department shall inform policyholders of the location of the
123 Division of Administrative Hearings and the division's website
124 address for purposes of filing a petition for resolving a claim.
125 The policyholder shall also serve, by certified mail or
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
126 electronic means, copies of the petition to resolve claims on
127 the insurer. The costs of the procedure mediation must be
128 reasonable, and the parties insurer must bear all of the cost of
129 conducting mediation conferences, except as otherwise provided
130 in this section. If a policyholder fails to appear at the
131 conference, the conference must be rescheduled upon the
132 policyholder's payment of the costs of a rescheduled conference.
133 If the insurer fails to appear at the conference, the insurer
134 must pay the policyholder's actual cash expenses incurred in
135 attending the conference if the insurer's failure to attend was
136 not due to a good cause acceptable to the department. An insurer
137 will be deemed to have failed to appear if the insurer's
138 representative lacks authority to settle the full value of the
139 claim. The insurer shall incur an additional fee for a
140 rescheduled conference necessitated by the insurer's failure to
141 appear at a scheduled conference. The fees assessed by the
142 department must include a charge necessary to defray the
143 expenses of the department related to its duties under this
144 section and must be deposited in the Insurance Regulatory Trust
145 Fund. The department may suspend the insurer's authority to
146 appoint licensees if the insurer does not timely pay the
147 required fees.
148 (4) Upon receipt of the petition, an administrative law
149 judge shall review it and shall dismiss any petition or any
150 portion of such petition which does not on its face specifically
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
151 identify or itemize all of the following information:
152 (a) The policyholder's name, address, telephone number,
153 and social security number.
154 (b) The insurer's name, address, and telephone number.
155 (c) A detailed description of the loss or damage for which
156 the claim has been filed, including the date it occurred.
157 (d) The alleged acts or omissions of the insurer giving
158 rise to the dispute, including, if applicable, a denial of
159 coverage.
160 (e) An estimate of damages, if known, and the amount that
161 is disputed by the insurer.
162 (f) A specific explanation of any other disputed issue
163 that the administrative law judge will be called to rule upon
164 The department shall adopt by rule a property insurance
165 mediation program to be administered by the department or its
166 designee. The department may also adopt special rules which are
167 applicable in cases of an emergency within the state. The rules
168 shall be modeled after practices and procedures set forth in
169 mediation rules of procedure adopted by the Supreme Court. The
170 rules shall provide for:
171 (a) Reasonable requirement for processing and scheduling
172 of requests for mediation.
173 (b) Qualifications , denial of application, suspension ,
174 revocation of approval, and other penalties for mediators as
175 provided in s. 627.745 and the Florida Rules for Certified and
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
176 Court-Appointed Mediators.
177 (c) Provisions governing who may attend mediation
178 conferences.
179 (d) Selection of mediators.
180 (e) Criteria for the conduct of mediation conferences.
181 (f) Right to legal counsel.
182 (5) The petition must include a certification by the
183 policyholder or, if the policyholder is represented by counsel,
184 the policyholder's attorney stating that the policyholder or
185 attorney, as applicable, has made a good faith effort to resolve
186 the dispute with the insurer and that the policyholder or
187 attorney was unable to resolve the dispute with the insurer All
188 statements made and documents produced at a mediation conference
189 shall be deemed to be settlement negotiations in anticipation of
190 litigation within the scope of s. 90.408. All parties to the
191 mediation must negotiate in good faith and must have the
192 authority to immediately settle the claim. Mediators are deemed
193 to be agents of the department and shall have the immunity from
194 suit provided in s. 44.107.
195 (6)(a) The dismissal of any petition or portion of such a
196 petition under this section is without prejudice and does not
197 require a hearing Mediation is nonbinding; however, if a written
198 settlement is reached, the policyholder has 3 business days
199 within which the policyholder may rescind the settlement unless
200 the policyholder has cashed or deposited any check or draft
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
201 disbursed to the policyholder for the disputed matters as a
202 result of the conference. If a settlement agreement is reached
203 and is not rescinded, it is binding and acts as a release of all
204 specific claims that were presented in that mediation
205 conference.
206 (b) At the conclusion of the mediation, the mediator shall
207 provide a written report of the results of mediation, including
208 any settlement amount, to the insurer, the policyholder, and the
209 policyholder's representative if the policyholder is represented
210 at the mediation.
211 (7) All motions to dismiss must be handled as specified in
212 s. 440.192(5) If the insurer fails to comply with subsection (2)
213 by failing to notify a policyholder of its right to participate
214 in the mediation program under this section or if the insurer
215 requests the mediation, and the mediation results are rejected
216 by either party, the policyholder is not required to submit to
217 or participate in any contractual loss appraisal process of the
218 property loss damage as a precondition to legal action for
219 breach of contract against the insurer for its failure to pay
220 the policyholder's claims covered by the policy.
221 (8) Within 14 days after receipt of the petition, the
222 insurer shall pay the requested claim or file a response to the
223 petition with the Division of Administrative Hearings. If the
224 insurer files a response to the petition, the response must be
225 filed by electronic means. Such response must specify all claims
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
226 requested but not paid and explain the insurer's reason for
227 nonpayment. The insurer shall provide copies of the response to
228 the policyholder by certified mail or by electronic means. In
229 ruling on the petition and response to the petition, the
230 administrative law judge shall conduct proceedings in a manner
231 consistent with the process outlined in s. 440.25, except that
232 the administrative law judge shall make a determination within
233 60 days after the filing of the policyholder's petition. After
234 determining coverage, the administrative law judge shall make a
235 final determination of the total coverage amount within 180 days
236 after the filing of the petition, which must be paid to the
237 policyholder or held in escrow on the policyholder's behalf
238 until exhausted for covered claims The department may designate
239 an entity or person to serve as administrator to carry out any
240 of the provisions of this section and may take this action by
241 means of a written contract or agreement.
242 (9) For purposes of this section, the term "claim" refers
243 to any dispute between an insurer and a policyholder relating to
244 a material issue of fact other than a dispute:
245 (a) With respect to which the insurer has a reasonable
246 basis to suspect fraud;
247 (b) When the insurer has determined, based on agreed-upon
248 facts as to the cause of loss, there is no coverage under the
249 policy;
250 (c) With respect to which the insurer has a reasonable
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
251 basis to believe that the policyholder has intentionally made a
252 material misrepresentation of fact which is relevant to the
253 claim, and the entire request for payment of a loss has been
254 denied on the basis of the material misrepresentation;
255 (d) With respect to which the amount in controversy is
256 less than $500, unless the parties agree to mediate a dispute
257 involving a lesser amount; or
258 (e) With respect to a loss that does not comply with s.
259 627.70132.
260 Section 2. Section 627.70151, Florida Statutes, is
261 repealed.
262 Section 3. Section 627.70152, Florida Statutes, is
263 repealed.
264 Section 4. Section 627.70153, Florida Statutes, is
265 repealed.
266 Section 5. Section 627.70154, Florida Statutes, is
267 repealed.
268 Section 6. Paragraph (ll) of subsection (6) of section
269 627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
270 627.351 Insurance risk apportionment plans.—
271 (6) CITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.—
272 (ll)1. In addition to any other method of alternative
273 dispute resolution authorized by state law, the corporation may
274 adopt policy forms that provide for the resolution of disputes
275 regarding its claim determinations, including disputes regarding
Page 11 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
276 coverage for, or the scope and value of, a claim, in a
277 proceeding before the Division of Administrative Hearings. Any
278 such policies are not subject to s. 627.70154. All proceedings
279 in the Division of Administrative Hearings pursuant to such
280 policies are subject to ss. 57.105 and 768.79 as if filed in the
281 courts of this state and are not considered chapter 120
282 administrative proceedings. Rule 1.442, Florida Rules of Civil
283 Procedure, applies to any offer served pursuant to s. 768.79,
284 except that, notwithstanding any provision in Rule 1.442,
285 Florida Rules of Civil Procedure, to the contrary, an offer
286 shall not be served earlier than 10 days after filing the
287 request for hearing with the Division of Administrative Hearings
288 and shall not be served later than 10 days before the date set
289 for the final hearing. The administrative law judge in such
290 proceedings shall award attorney fees and other relief pursuant
291 to ss. 57.105 and 768.79. The corporation may not seek, and the
292 office may not approve, a maximum hourly rate for attorney fees.
293 2. The corporation may contract with the division to
294 conduct proceedings to resolve disputes regarding its claim
295 determinations as may be provided for in the applicable policies
296 of insurance. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2026.
297 Section 7. Paragraph (a) of subsection (8) of section
298 627.70131, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
299 627.70131 Insurer's duty to acknowledge communications
300 regarding claims; investigation.—
Page 12 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 459 2026
301 (8) The requirements of this section are tolled:
302 (a) During the pendency of any proceedings mediation
303 proceeding under s. 627.7015 or any alternative dispute
304 resolution proceeding provided for in the insurance contract.
305 The tolling period ends upon the end of the proceedings
306 mediation or alternative dispute resolution proceeding.
307 Section 8. Subsection (3) of section 627.7074, Florida
308 Statutes, is amended to read:
309 627.7074 Alternative procedure for resolution of disputed
310 sinkhole insurance claims.—
311 (3) If there is coverage available under the policy and
312 the claim was submitted within the timeframe provided in s.
313 627.706(5), following the receipt of the report provided under
314 s. 627.7073 or the denial of a claim for a sinkhole loss, the
315 insurer shall notify the policyholder of his or her right to
316 participate in the neutral evaluation program under this
317 section. Neutral evaluation supersedes the alternative dispute
318 resolution process under s. 627.7015 but does not invalidate the
319 appraisal clause of the insurance policy. The insurer shall
320 provide to the policyholder the consumer information pamphlet
321 prepared by the department pursuant to subsection (1)
322 electronically or by United States mail.
323 Section 9. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 13 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb459-00